California statutes. Water Code
Members of the board of a district whose terms have not been staggered as of the date when this section becomes effective shall meet and classify themselves by lot into two classes as nearly equal in number as possible in order to determine when their respective terms shall expire. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the term of office of the class having the lesser number of members shall be deemed to expire on the date for the general district election in 1969. The terms of the other members shall be deemed to expire on the date for the general district election in 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50603.

After the first election of the board, the district is organized and has power to sue and be sued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50604.

Vacancies in the board shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

50605.

(a) Each member of the board shall receive such compensation for services actually and necessarily performed as the board determines to be just and reasonable, and shall be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of his duties as trustee.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

50606.

All claims by or in behalf of a trustee for services rendered or expenses incurred shall be presented to the board, and, if allowed, shall be paid in the same manner as other indebtedness of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50609.

Except as otherwise provided in the by-laws, any meeting of the board at which all members are present, or of which all members have received written notice at least one day prior thereto, is a regular meeting at which any business may be transacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50610.

Members of the board of trustees appointed pursuant to Section 58762.1 of the Government Code shall be immune from liability to creditors of the district for debts incurred prior to their appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Officers [50630. - 50631.]

50630.

The board shall elect one of its members as its president, and one of its members, or any other person, as its secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50631.

The secretary shall have charge of the office of the board, keep the minutes of all meetings, attest all documents, other than bonds, requiring the signature of the president, and keep accounts of all expenditures made in behalf of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [50650. - 50660.]

50650.

The board is the governing body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50651.

The powers of the district enumerated in this division shall, except as therein otherwise provided, be exercised by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50652.

The board shall exercise general supervision and complete control over the construction, maintenance and operation of the reclamation works, and generally over the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50653.

The board shall receive from the reclamation board any money allowed on account of uncollected assessments previously levied on lands purchased by the board for rights of way, and shall distribute the money among the landowners of the district in proportion to their payments on the last assessment roll or place the money in the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50654.

The board, pursuant to an order entered in its minutes, may distribute, among the landowners of the district, any surplus funds in the treasury belonging to the district not needed for reclamation purposes, in the proportion that the landowners were assessed on the last assessment made by the district and which assessment produced such surplus money by collections thereon or by rental or sale of delinquent land thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50655.

The board may adopt and alter a seal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 39.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

50656.

All documents requiring approval by the board shall bear the signature of either a trustee or the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 40.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

50657.

The board may create a revolving fund by an order entered in its minutes and shall file a copy of the order, certified by the president, with the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50658.

No warrant for the creation or replenishment of a revolving fund shall be paid by the county treasurer unless the order creating the revolving fund includes the assumption by the district of the responsibility for the disbursement of the fund and contains an agreement to hold and save the county treasurer harmless from any improper disbursement of the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 939, Sec. 26.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 939.)
-------------------------------------------

50659.

A revolving fund shall be disbursed only by checks or drafts, signed by at least two members of the board, or by some person who is authorized to do so by unanimous vote of the board. No person shall be so authorized until the person has filed with the board a bond in the amount required by the board and in no event less than double the amount of the fund. The bond shall be conditioned as security for the safety and proper disbursements of the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 407.)
-------------------------------------------

50660.

The county treasurer shall be deemed the ex officio treasurer of the district unless the board, by resolution, and with the written consent of the county treasurer, appoints a district treasurer. If the resolution is adopted and a district treasurer is appointed, all references to a county treasurer or county treasury within this division shall be deemed to apply to the treasurer appointed by the board and the treasury of the district, and no further consent of the county treasurer will be required. The person so appointed shall file a bond with the board in the manner prescribed in Section 50659.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 246, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [50700. - 50817.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [50700. - 50707.]

50700.

An election board consists of three landowners of the district or legal representatives who shall be appointed by the board of supervisors and shall consist of one inspector and two judges of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50701.

The board, prior to each election, shall cause a copy of the appropriate roll to be utilized pursuant to Section 50704 to be prepared and certified by the proper officer and furnished to the election board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

50702.

The certified roll furnished to the election board shall be used by the election board in determining the number of votes each voter may cast.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.2.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

50703.

If a member of the election board fails to attend at the opening of the polls, the voters present may appoint in his place any landowner or legal representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50704.

Each voter in the district may vote at any election in person or by proxy, and may cast his or her votes as follows:

(a) If the district has, within the calendar year preceding that in which the election occurs, levied an operation and maintenance assessment pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of this division, then each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each dollar’s worth of assessment valuation as shown on that assessment roll for all parcels owned by the voter or his principal.

(b) If the district has not levied an operation and maintenance assessment pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of this division during the calendar year preceding that in which the election occurs, but has during that year ordered payment of an installment on an original or additional assessment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 51510) of Chapter 3 of Part 7 of this division, or levied fees and charges pursuant to Section 50902, then each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each dollar’s worth of installment or fee and charge levied in the preceding year upon all parcels owned by the voter or his principal.

(c) If neither an operation and maintenance assessment nor an installment upon an original or additional assessment nor fee or charge was levied or ordered paid by the district during the calendar year preceding that
 in which the election occurs, then each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each acre owned by the voter or his principal within the district, provided that if the voter or his principal owns less than one acre then the voter shall be entitled to one vote and any fraction shall be rounded to the nearest full acre.

(d) When a district elects to have the board of supervisors levy a special tax on behalf of the district on all taxable land and improvements pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 51360) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of this division, then each voter may vote at any district election in person or by proxy, and may cast one vote for each dollar’s worth of taxable land and improvements owned by him or his principal in the district, as determined from the last equalized tax roll of each county in which the lands of the district are situated.

(e) The ownership and
 number of acres owned for the purpose of this section shall be determined from the last equalized tax roll of each county in which the lands of the district are situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.4.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

50704.5.

When a parcel is held as community property or in joint tenancy or as tenants in common, any spouse or joint tenant or tenant in common shall be presumed to have authority to cast all votes for the parcel upon filing with the election board a certification under penalty of perjury identifying the spouse, joint tenants, or tenants in common for whom the votes are to be cast. A legal representative, upon filing with the election board a certification under penalty of perjury identifying the principal and the authority of the legal representative, shall be presumed to have authority to cast all votes for the principal identified in
 the certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

50705.

The polls shall be kept open from 10 a.m. of the day of election until 4 p.m. Where the real property in the district is assessed to 500 or more different individual, joint, or corporate owners, the board may elect to keep the polls open from 7 a.m. of the day of election until 7 p.m. and in that event shall include the time of polling in the notice as provided in Section 50732. However, when the board holds an election which does not involve added costs to any other local governmental entity, the board may elect to keep the polls open from 7 a.m. of the day of election until 8 p.m. and in that event shall include the time of polling in the notice as
 provided in Section 50732.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1327, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

50707.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and regardless of the number of eligible voters within its boundaries, a district may, by resolution of its governing board, conduct any election by all-mailed ballots pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Elections Code.

(b) An election conducted pursuant to this section shall be held on a date prescribed in Section 1500 of the Elections Code or on any other date other than an established election date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 132, Sec. 3.   (SB 1188)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Elections [50730. - 50759.]



  ARTICLE 1. Calling [50730. - 50732.]

50730.

There shall be an election in each district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year at such place in or near the district as designated by the board. The costs of the election shall be a charge upon the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50731.

In addition to the regular election under Section 50730, upon receipt of a recommendation of the board of trustees or upon receipt of a verified petition of 20 percent of the landowners who, together, own at least 20 percent in value of the lands in the district, as determined from the last tax roll of the county, the board of supervisors shall appoint a time, not less than 75 days or more than 90 days after receipt of the petition, and place for holding a general district election for the unexpired term of the trustees then serving.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 824, Sec. 4.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

50731.5.

(a) Nominations for the office of trustee shall be made by petition filed with the secretary not earlier than 75 days or later than 5 p.m. on the 54th day before the election.

(b) The petition shall be signed as follows:

(1) If there are 15 or more qualified voters in the district, by five or more qualified voters.

(2) If there are less than 15
 qualified voters in the district, by one or more qualified voters.

(c) Notice that the petitions may be received shall be published once by the secretary at least seven days prior to the final date for receiving petitions. If the election includes the balance of an unexpired term, the notice shall state that the petition must indicate whether the nomination is for that unexpired term. The notice shall be published in a newspaper in each county in which any of the district lands are situated, if any newspaper is published therein, and if not, in a newspaper having general circulation therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 454, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50731.6.

The nomination petition shall be in substantially the following form: Official Filing Petition

 Nomination of CandidateWe, the undersigned voters of Reclamation District No. ____, hereby nominate ___________ (name of
 candidate) for the office of Trustee of the District for a term of ____ years.NameDateResidenceAffidavit of CirculatorState of California⎫County of ⎭ss.__________ (name of circulator), being duly sworn, deposes and says:
That __________ (he/she) circulated the foregoing petition and saw all the signa­tures appended thereto and knows that they are the signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be.(Signature of circulator)Subscribed and sworn to before methis ___ day of ________, 20__.Notary Public in and for the Countyof ____, State of California.My commission expires ____.
 Affidavit of NomineeState of California⎫County of ⎭ss._________ (name of nominee), being duly sworn, says that he/she is the above-named nominee for the office of _____ (office), that he/she will accept the office in the event of his/her election, that he/she desires his/her name to appear on the ballot as follows:(Print name above)that he/she desires the following occupational designation, containing not more than three words, to appear on the ballot under his/her name, and that this designation is correct.(Print desired designation, if any, above)(Signature of nominee)Subscribed and sworn to before methis ___ day of ________, 20__.Notary Public in and for the Countyof ____, State of California.My commission expires ____.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 454, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50732.

Notice of the election shall be published by the secretary once a week for four weeks beginning not less than one month prior to the date of election in the same newspaper or newspapers used for publication of the notice calling for nomination petitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Appointments in Lieu of Election [50740. - 50742.]

50740.

If by 5 p.m. on the 54th day prior to a general district election the number of nominees does not exceed the number of trustees to be elected and if a petition signed by 5 percent of the voters requesting that the election be held has not been presented to the board, an election shall not be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50741.

When no election is held pursuant to Section 50740 then the board of supervisors shall appoint those nominated for the positions of trustee, and if no person has been nominated for said position, the board of supervisors shall appoint any qualified person or persons. In lieu of the notice provided in Section 50732, notice shall than be published only once stating that the board of supervisors will appoint the trustees and that no election will be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50742.

If pursuant to Section 50740 a district election is not held, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district, or the largest part thereof in area, is situated shall at its next regular meeting appoint to the positions of trustees those persons nominated, or if no persons have been nominated for said positions, the board of supervisors shall appoint any qualified person or persons, and such person or persons shall qualify, take office, and serve exactly as if elected at a general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conducting [50750. - 50759.]

50750.

Each member of the election board, upon entering upon his duties, shall be sworn to a faithful performance thereof by some officer authorized to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50751.

If the board of supervisors fails to appoint an election board, the voters present at the opening of the polls may appoint the election board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50752.

The election board shall canvass the votes cast and issue certificates of election to the persons elected, and shall place the ballots, when canvassed, in a sealed envelope and forward it to the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50753.

Each voter may cumulate his votes, and give one candidate a number of votes equal to the number of trustees to be elected multiplied by the number of votes he is entitled to cast, or to distribute them on the same principle among any number of candidates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

50754.

The board of directors of irrigation districts holding title to lands obtained through collectors’ deeds may cast the votes belonging to such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50755.

Any qualified voter may challenge any vote, and the election board shall determine whether the person challenged is entitled to vote. Any member of the election board may administer oaths for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50756.

The candidates, of the number to be elected, receiving the highest number of votes shall be deemed elected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50757.

Any person who knowingly makes an untrue statement in establishing his right to vote in a district election shall incur all of the penalties provided in the Elections Code for persons illegally voting at elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

50758.

If the ownership of any property in the district is changed after the making of the last equalized tax roll for the county wherein the property is situated, the owner thereof or his legal representative may vote at a district election upon the production of evidence of ownership of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50759.

No person shall vote by proxy at a district election unless authority to vote is evidenced by an instrument in writing acknowledged and certified in the same manner as grants of real property and filed with the election board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Reclamation District No. 1000 [50780. - 50780.22.]

50780.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter applies to the manner in which elections are conducted in the Reclamation District No. 1000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.2.

“District,” for purposes of this chapter, means the Reclamation District No. 1000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.4.

(a) A “land assessment seat,” for purposes of this chapter, means a seat held by a trustee elected by voters as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50780.10 in accordance with Sections 50701, 50702, 50704, and 50704.5.

(b) For the purpose of voting for a trustee to hold a land assessment seat, each voter may cast his or her votes for each land assessment seat in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.6.

(a) A “parcel seat,” for purposes of this chapter, means a seat held by a trustee elected by voters as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50780.10 which have one vote for each parcel owned.

(b) For the purpose of voting for a trustee to hold a parcel seat, each landowner may cast his or her vote or votes for each parcel seat.

(c) The last equalized assessment book of the district is conclusive evidence of
 ownership for the purpose of voting for a parcel seat, except that the last equalized assessment roll of the county in which the land is located shall be used in lieu of the assessment book of the district if an assessment is not levied for the year in which the election is held.

(d) Section 50704.5 applies for the purpose of voting for any parcel seat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.8.

(a) A “resident voter seat,” for purposes of this chapter, means a seat held by a trustee elected by voters as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 50780.10.

(b) For purposes of voting for a trustee to hold a resident voter seat, each voter may cast one vote for each resident voter seat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.10.

A “voter” means any of the following:

(a) A landowner or the legal representative of a landowner.

(b) A voter as defined in Section 359 of the Elections Code who resides within the boundaries of the district.

(c) A voter as defined in subdivision (a) may vote for both parcel seats and land assessment seats.

(d) A voter as defined in subdivision (a) who is also a voter as defined in subdivision (b) may vote for both resident voter seats and land assessment seats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 241.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.12.

Commencing with the 1993 district election, the district shall have a seven-member board, whose trustees are residents of the district. The residency requirement does not apply to any trustee holding office on July 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.14.

At the 1993 district election, the board shall designate the seats of the two trustees whose terms expire and the two new seats as “land assessment seats.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.16.

At the 1995 district election, the board shall designate the seats of the three trustees whose terms expire as “parcel seats.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.18.

(a) The manner in which the trustees shall be elected at the 1997 district election, and at every district election thereafter, depends on the percentage of land in the district that is used for agricultural purposes that is subject to an assessment pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(b) Between 180 and 200 days before the election, the board shall determine whether the percentage of
 land described in subdivision (a) has equaled or exceeded 35 percent during the immediately preceding two years. If so, the board shall designate four seats as “land assessment seats” and three seats as “parcel seats.”

(c) Between 180 and 200 days before the election, the board shall determine whether the percentage of land described in subdivision (a) has been below 35 percent and has equaled or exceeded 20 percent during the immediately preceding two years. If so, the board shall designate four seats as “parcel seats” and three seats as “land assessment seats.”

(d) Between 180 and 200 days before the election, the board shall determine whether the percentage of land described in subdivision (a) has been below 20 percent during the immediately preceding two years. If so, the board shall designate five seats as “resident voter seats” and two seats as “land assessment
 seats.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.20.

At the time of a designation pursuant to Section 50780.18, the board shall adjust, by lot, the length of the terms of any trustees whose terms are not otherwise scheduled to expire if the adjustment is necessary to comply with the designation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50780.22.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this part applies to a district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Special Elections [50800. - 50817.]



  ARTICLE 1. Calling [50800. - 50805.]

50800.

A special election is an election called pursuant to the provisions of this part to submit to the landowners the question of whether or not bonds or refunding bonds shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50801.

The board shall call a special election when either:

(a) The board determines that the issuance of bonds or refunding bonds is to the best interests of the district, or

(b) A petition requesting such election, signed by the owners of more than one-half of the land in the district, is filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50802.

Notice of a special election shall be given by the board by posting notices thereof in at least three public places in the district at least 21 days prior thereto, and by publication for 21 days in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county where any portion of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50803.

When a special election is called to determine whether bonds of the district shall be issued, the notice shall specify the time and place of holding the election, the aggregate face value of bonds proposed to be issued and the names of three landowners or legal representatives to act as an election board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50804.

When the special election is called to determine whether refunding bonds shall be issued, the notices shall be substantially in the following form: 

“Notice of special election to determine whether or not refunding bonds shall be issued.

Notice is hereby given that at a meeting of the board of trustees of reclamation district No. ____ held on the ____ day of ____, 19__, a resolution and order was duly adopted by the said board calling a special election of the landowners of this district, for ____ the ____ day of ____, 19__, at ____ in the county of ____ in said district, to determine
 whether or not ____ dollars ($____) of the principal amount of the outstanding bonds of this district, dated the ____ day of ____, 19__, and maturing as follows, to wit: ____ shall be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds of said district of the aggregate principal amount of ____ dollars ($____) and maturing as follows, to wit: ____.

And notice is hereby further given that ____ and ____ and ____ three landowners of said district, are hereby appointed to act as the board of election for said election.

The polls at said election will be open from 10 a.m. of said day until 4 p.m.Witness the name and the seal of the said district 
this ____ day of ____,
 19__.
(SEAL)Reclamation District No. ____By President.By Secretary.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50805.

An affidavit of the publication and posting of the notice shall be filed with the county elections official, with a copy of the order calling the election which is certified by the president.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conducting [50810. - 50817.]

50810.

Each member of the election board, before entering upon his duties, shall take and subscribe an official oath administered by an officer authorized to administer oaths or by any landowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50811.

Any person not legally qualified to vote who makes any false statement in respect to his right to vote in a special election to determine whether bonds or refunding bonds shall be issued shall incur all of the penalties provided in the Elections Code for persons illegally voting at elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50812.

If the ownership of any property in the district is changed after the making of the last equalized tax roll for the county wherein the property is situated, the owner thereof or his legal representative may vote at a special election to determine if bonds or refunding bonds shall be issued upon production of the original deed or of certified copy of the record thereof in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50813.

No person shall vote by proxy at a special election unless the authority to vote is evidenced by an instrument in writing, acknowledged and certified in the same manner as grants of real property and filed with the election board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50814.

The ballots cast at the special election shall contain the words: “Bonds—yes” or the words “Bonds—no,” or “Refunding Bonds—yes,” or “Refunding Bonds—no,” as the case may be, the name of the person casting the ballot, and the number of votes cast by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50815.

A list of the ballots cast shall be made by the election board containing the name of each voter, the number of votes cast by him, whether they were cast for or against the issuing of the bonds or refunding bonds, and, if the ballot is cast by proxy, the name of the person casting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50816.

At the close of the polls the election board shall:

(a) Immediately canvass the votes and declare the result.

(b) Forward a certificate showing the result and the number of votes cast for and against the issuing of bonds or refunding bonds to the county elections official.

(c) Deliver a copy of the certificate to the board.

(d) Deliver all ballots cast and all documents and papers used at the election to the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50817.

Any interested person may contest a special election within 20 days after the filing of the certificate with the county elections official by bringing suit in the superior court of the principal county. Unless contested, the declaration of the result by the election board is final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES [50900. - 50979.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Powers [50900. - 50907.]

50900.

A district may do all things necessary or convenient for accomplishing the purposes for which it was formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50901.

If a district is in debt it has no power to impair or destroy any of its indebtedness without the consent of the creditors, but it may make any arrangement with the creditors for the surrender of such indebtedness at less than par, and may levy an assessment on the lands in the district for the payment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50902.

(a) In addition to its other powers, a district may, by a resolution of the board at a noticed public hearing, fix and collect charges and fees, including minimum and standby charges, for the provision of benefits and services.

(b) Notice of the public hearing shall be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county.

(c) The board, in fixing the charges and fees, may establish the dates of delinquency and may impose penalties for delinquency not exceeding 10 percent of the amount of the charge or fee and may, in addition, collect interest at a rate not to exceed 1.5 percent per month from the date of delinquency on all delinquent charges and fees. The district may sue for the recovery of unpaid charges and fees or the unpaid charges or fees may be added to the operation and maintenance assessment in the same manner as unpaid water charges pursuant to Section 51440.

(d) The revenue obtained from charges and fees may be in lieu of, or supplemental to, revenue obtained in any other manner and may be used for any district purpose and the payment of any district obligation.

(e) After a charge or fee is initially fixed by the board at a noticed public hearing, the board may subsequently reduce that amount of that charge or fee without notice or a public hearing.

(f) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the board may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

50903.

A district of less than 100 acres and situated adjacent to the Stockton Ship Channel may acquire, construct, operate, maintain, repair, and improve lands, works, and facilities for the collection, treatment, and disposal of sewage and waste; herein called sanitation, and perform all matters germane thereto; provided, that no district may exercise any of the powers conferred by this section unless a petition approving the exercise of such powers is signed by a majority of the voters within the district and submitted to the district. In such event, it shall cause to be prepared and approved a plan therefor and prepare an estimate of the costs thereof, and may modify, change, or adopt a new, supplemental, or additional plan and estimate. The plan and estimate may include properties, works, and facilities already existing, or in the course of acquisition or construction, and payments therefor may be made to the landowner owning same, or to his legal representative. Such plan shall be reported and may be financed in the same manner as a plan for reclamation of district lands pursuant to this division.

Because of the recreational uses being made of the smaller islands in the vicinity of the improved Stockton Ship Channel, in order to protect the quality of the water, the Legislature finds and declares that it is necessary that reclamation districts of less than 100 acres and situated adjacent to the Stockton Ship Channel be able to exercise sanitation powers. Such circumstances are not generally applicable to reclamation districts. It is therefore declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this section as special legislation applicable only to such districts is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

50904.
